Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6323.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16177. (1) An individual applying for licensure or registration under this article shall do so on a form provided by the department. The department shall require each applicant to include on the application form his or her social security the applicant's Social Security number. The department shall not display an applicant's social security Social Security number on his or her the applicant's license or registration. If the facts set forth in the application meet the requirements of the board or task force and this article for licensure or registration, the board or task force shall grant a license or registration to the applicant. A Beginning on the effective date of the 2026 amendatory act that amended this section, a board or task force may shall require the applicant to take an a competency-based assessment examination approved by the department, in consultation with the board or task force, to determine if the applicant meets the qualifications for licensure or registration. The competency-based assessment examination shall must be nationally or regionally recognized, as determined by the department, in consultation with the board or task force, and include subjects determined by the board or task force to be essential to the safe and competent practice of the health profession, the appropriate use of a title, or both. Passing The competency-based assessment examination required under this subsection must be developed and administered in accordance with legally defensible psychometric standards, including criteria for validity and reliability. Subject to section 16178, passing scores or the procedure used to determine passing scores shall must be established before an the competency-based assessment examination is administered. An examination or other evaluation that is required for initial licensure or registration under another part of this article or by rule as of the effective date of the 2026 amendatory act that amended this subsection is considered to meet the competency-based assessment examination requirements described in this subsection, regardless of whether the examination or other evaluation is competency based. (2) In addition to the information required under subsection (1), an applicant for licensure or registration or a licensee or registrant applying for renewal shall include on a form provided by the department all of the following information, if applicable: (a) A felony conviction. (b) A misdemeanor conviction punishable by imprisonment for a maximum term of 2 years or a misdemeanor conviction involving the illegal delivery, possession, or use of alcohol or a controlled substance. (c) Sanctions imposed against the applicant by a similar licensure, registration, certification, or disciplinary board of another state or country. (3) In addition to the information required under subsections (1) and (2), a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, or podiatrist applying for licensure or renewal under this article shall report to the department on a form provided by the department the name of each hospital with which he or she the physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, or podiatrist is employed or under contract, and each hospital in which he or she the physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, or podiatrist is allowed to practice. (4) In addition to the information required under subsections (1), (2), and (3), an applicant for licensure and , beginning the license renewal cycle after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 16213, a licensee applying for renewal shall provide the department, on the application or the license renewal form, with an affidavit stating that he or she the applicant or licensee has a written policy for protecting, maintaining, and providing access to his or her the applicant's or licensee's medical records in accordance with section 16213 and for complying with section 16213 in the event that he or she the applicant or licensee sells or closes his or her the applicant's or licensee's practice, retires from practice, or otherwise ceases to practice under this article. The applicant or licensee shall make the written policy available to the department upon request. (5) A requirement under this section to include a social security Social Security number on an application does not apply to an applicant who demonstrates he or she that the applicant is exempt under law from obtaining a social security Social Security number or to an applicant who for religious convictions is exempt under law from disclosure of his or her social security the applicant's Social Security number under these circumstances. The department shall inform the applicant of this possible exemption. Sec. 16178. (1) Unless otherwise necessary for a board the department to fulfill national or regional testing requirements, the department shall conduct examinations or other evaluations necessary to determine qualifications of applicants for initial licensure or registration in intervals determined by the department, at least annually and may conduct other investigations or evaluations necessary to determine the qualifications of applicants. A board may accept passing a national or regional examination developed for use in the United States for the purpose of meeting a state board examination or a part thereof. (2) An individual who fails to pass a required examination may be reexamined to the extent and in a manner determined by the board.department, in consultation with the board. (3) The department shall give public notice of the time and place of a required regular initial licensure or registration examination or evaluation in a manner it considers best not less than 90 days before the date of the examination or evaluation.